ja: 目標相対湿度 (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; その他
hr-HR: Ciljana relativna vlažnost (RH): 40 % RH; 45 % RH; 46 % RH; 49 % RH; 50 % RH; 55 % RH; Ostalo
fi: Tavoiteltu suhteellinen kosteus: 40 % RH; 45 % RH; 46 % RH; 49 % RH; 50 % RH; 55 % RH; Muu
ko: 목표 상대 습도(RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; 기타
nl: Doel relatieve luchtvochtigheid (RH): 40% RV; 45% RV; 46% RV; 49% RV; 50% RV; 55% RV; Overig
sv: Målvärde för relativ luftfuktighet (RH): 40 % RH; 45 % RH; 46 % RH; 49 % RH; 50 % RH; 55 % RH; Annat
nb: Mål for relativ fuktighet (RH): 40 % RF; 45 % RF; 46 % RF; 49 % RF; 50 % RF; 55 % RF; Annet
fr: Humidité relative cible (HR): 40 % HR; 45 % HR; 46 % HR; 49 % HR; 50 % HR; 55 % HR; Autre
cs: Cílová relativní vlhkost (RV): 40 % RH; 45 % RH; 46 % RH; 49 % RH; 50 % RH; 55 % RH; Jiné
zh-CN: 目标相对湿度（RH）: 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; 其他
bg-BG: Целева относителна влажност (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; Друго
lt-LT: Tikslinė santykinė drėgmė (RH): 40 % sant. drėgmė; 45 % sant. drėgmė; 46 % sant. drėgmė; 49 % sant. drėgmė; 50 % sant. drėgmė; 55 % sant. drėgmė; Kita
zh-TW: 目標相對濕度 (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; 其他
es: Humedad relativa (HR) del objetivo: 40% HR; 45% HR; 46% HR; 49% HR; 50% HR; 55% HR; Otra
el: Στόχος σχετικής υγρασίας (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; Άλλο
pl: Docelowa wilgotność względna (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; Inna
vi: Độ ẩm tương đối mục tiêu (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; Khác
en: Target relative humidity (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; Other
sk-SK: Cieľová relatívna vlhkosť (RH): 40 % RH; 45 % RH; 46 % RH; 49 % RH; 50 % RH; 55 % RH; Iné
ru: Целевая относительная влажность (RH): Относительная влажность 40%; Относительная влажность 45%; Относительная влажность 46%; Относительная влажность 49%; Относительная влажность 50%; Относительная влажность 55%; Другое
tr: Hedef bağıl nem (RH): %40 RH; %45 RH; %46 RH; %49 RH; %50 RH; %55 RH; Diğer
it: Umidità relativa (UR) target: 40% UR; 45% UR; 46% UR; 49% UR; 50% UR; 55% UR; Altro
th: ความชื้นสัมพัทธ์เป้าหมาย (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Umiditate relativă (UR) vizată: 40% UR; 45% UR; 46% UR; 49% UR; 50% UR; 55% UR; Altele
da: Relativ målfugtighed (RH): 40 % RH; 45 % RH; 46 % RH; 49 % RH; 50 % RH; 55 % RH; Andet
pt-BR: Umidade relativa (UR) alvo: 40% de UR; 45% de UR; 46% de UR; 49% de UR; 50% de UR; 55% de UR; Outro
sl-SI: Ciljna relativna vlažnost: 40 % RV; 45 % RV; 46 % RV; 49 % RV; 50 % RV; 55 % RV; Drugo
pt-PT: Humidade relativa alvo (HR): 40% HR; 45% HR; 46% HR; 49% HR; 50% HR; 55% HR; Outro
hu: Célzott relatív páratartalom (RH): 40% RH; 45% RH; 46% RH; 49% RH; 50% RH; 55% RH; Egyéb
de: Zielwert der relativen Luftfeuchtigkeit (RH): 40 % RH; 45 % RH; 46 % RH; 49 % RH; 50 % RH; 55 % RH; Sonstige